Hawaii statutes.
§201-13 Powers and duties of the department
of business, economic development, and tourism in marine affairs. The
department of business, economic development, and tourism shall:

(1) Assist state agencies in developing and analyzing
plans, including objectives, criteria to measure the accomplishment of
objectives, programs through which the objectives are to be attained, and
financial requirements for the total and optimum development of Hawaii's marine
resources based on the needs and goals of the State;

(2) Develop and analyze plans for future economic
development projects, including objectives and criteria to measure the
accomplishment of objectives; develop and implement programs through which the
objectives are to be attained; and determine financial requirements for the
total and optimum development of Hawaii's marine resources based on the needs
and goals of the State;

(3) Assist those departments having interests in
marine affairs, coordinate those activities which involve the responsibilities
of multiple state agencies, and encourage the timely and effective
implementation of all authorized marine projects and programs;

(4) Coordinate the dissemination of information to
the federal government, other state governments, governments of nations with
interests in the Pacific basin, private and public organizations involved in
marine science and technology, and commercial enterprises of Hawaii's
leadership potential as the center for marine affairs;

(5) Coordinate the State's involvement in national and
international efforts to investigate, develop and utilize the marine resources
of the Pacific basin;

(6) Develop programs to continuously encourage
private and public marine exploration and research projects which will result
in the development of improved technological capabilities in Hawaii; and

(7) Formulate and assist state agencies in
formulating specific program and project proposals to solicit increased
investment by the federal government and other sources to develop Hawaii's
marine resources. [L 1982, c 281, §2; am L 1984, c 262, §1; am L 1987, c 336,
§7; am L 1990, c 293, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next